Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-111 Effect of paid claims.
(a) Any person recovering under this part shall be deemed to have assigned the
person's rights under the policy to the association to the extent of the
person's recovery from the association. Every insured or claimant seeking the
protection of this part shall cooperate with the association to the same extent
as that person would have been required to cooperate with the insolvent
insurer. The association shall have no cause of action against the insured of
the insolvent insurer for any sums it has paid out except any causes of action
that the insolvent insurer would have had if those sums had been paid by the
insolvent insurer and except as provided in subsection (b). In the case of an
insolvent insurer operating as an assessable mutual company on a plan with
assessment liability, payments of claims of the association shall not operate
to reduce the liability of the insureds to the receiver, liquidator, or
statutory successor for unpaid assessment.

(b) The association shall have the right to
recover from the following persons the amount of any covered claim paid on
behalf of such person pursuant to this part:

(1) Any insured whose net worth on December 31 of the
year immediately preceding the date the insurer becomes an insolvent insurer
exceeds fifty million dollars and whose liability obligations to other persons
are satisfied in whole or in part by payments made under this part; and

(2) Any person who is an affiliate of the insolvent
insurer and whose liability obligations to other persons are satisfied in whole
or in part by payments made under this part.

(c) The association and a similar organization
in another state shall be recognized as claimants in the liquidation of an
insolvent insurer for any amounts paid by them on covered claims as determined
under this part or similar laws in other states and shall receive dividends and
any other distributions at the priority set forth in section 431:15-332. The
receiver, liquidator, or statutory successor of an insolvent insurer shall be
bound by determinations of covered claim eligibility under this part and by
settlements of claims by the association or a similar organization in another
state to the extent the determinations or settlements satisfy obligations of the
association. The receiver shall not be bound in any way by the determinations
or settlements to the extent there remains a claim against the insolvent
insurer. The court having jurisdiction shall grant such claims priority equal
to that to which the claimant would have been entitled in the absence of this
part against the assets of the insolvent insurer.

(d) The association shall periodically file
with the receiver or liquidator of the insolvent insurer statements of the
covered claims paid by the association and estimates of anticipated claims on
the association, which shall preserve the rights of the association against the
assets of the insolvent insurer. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2000, c 93,
§10]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next